Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1912.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 4905.1. Swatting.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits the offense of swatting if by means of a telecommunications device or telecommunications service the person intentionally or knowingly makes or causes to be made a false report of a crime or medical or other emergency:(1) To a law enforcement agency, firefighter, fire company, emergency medical services agency or provider, 911 system operator or a government employee or contractor or an employee of a contractor who is authorized to receive a 1234567891011121314151617 report of a crime or medical or other emergency.(2) Under circumstances where the report is reasonably likely to cause an emergency response and the report does cause an emergency response.(b) Nonapplicability.--This section does not apply to a person conducting an authorized emergency drill.(c) Grading.--(1) Except as provided under paragraphs (2) and (3), an offense under this section constitutes a felony of the third degree.(2) If an individual suffers bodily injury in response to a false report, an offense under this section constitutes a felony of the second degree.(3) If an individual suffers serious bodily injury in response to a false report, an offense under this section constitutes a felony of the first degree.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Bodily injury." Impairment of physical condition or substantial pain."Serious bodily injury." Bodily injury which creates a substantial risk of death or which causes serious, permanent disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1912PN2393 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526